ctranslate-ol/frontend/dictionaries/hsb_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0220 Y 12
SFX 0220 ł le .
SFX 0220 ł ła .
SFX 0220 ł łach .
SFX 0220 ł łaj .
SFX 0220 ł łam .
SFX 0220 ł łami .
SFX 0220 ł łej .
SFX 0220 ł ło .
SFX 0220 ł łom .
SFX 0220 ł łomaj .
SFX 0220 ł łow .
SFX 0220 ł ły .

SFX 0221 Y 67
SFX 0221 i icy .
SFX 0221 i ili .
SFX 0221 i imoj .
SFX 0221 i imy .
SFX 0221 i itaj .
SFX 0221 i itej .
SFX 0221 i ić .
SFX 0221 i iće .
SFX 0221 i ił .
SFX 0221 i iła .
SFX 0221 i iłe .
SFX 0221 i iło .
SFX 0221 i iłoj .
SFX 0221 i iš .
SFX 0221 i ja .
SFX 0221 i jaca .
SFX 0221 i jacaj .
SFX 0221 i jace .
SFX 0221 i jaceho .
SFX 0221 i jacej .
SFX 0221 i jaceje .
SFX 0221 i jaceju .
SFX 0221 i jacemu .
SFX 0221 i jach .
SFX 0221 i jachmoj .
SFX 0221 i jachmy .
SFX 0221 i jachu .
SFX 0221 i jacoh .
SFX 0221 i jacom .
SFX 0221 i jacu .
SFX 0221 i jacy .
SFX 0221 i jacych .
SFX 0221 i jacym .
SFX 0221 i jacymaj .
SFX 0221 i jacymi .
SFX 0221 i jena .
SFX 0221 i jenaj .
SFX 0221 i jene .
SFX 0221 i jeneho .
SFX 0221 i jenej .
SFX 0221 i jeneje .
SFX 0221 i jeneju .
SFX 0221 i jenemu .
SFX 0221 i jeni .
SFX 0221 i jenja .
SFX 0221 i jenjach .
SFX 0221 i jenjam .
SFX 0221 i jenje .
SFX 0221 i jenjemi .
SFX 0221 i jenjom .
SFX 0221 i jenjomaj .
SFX 0221 i jenjow .
SFX 0221 i jenju .
SFX 0221 i jenoh .
SFX 0221 i jenom .
SFX 0221 i jenu .
SFX 0221 i jeny .
SFX 0221 i jenych .
SFX 0221 i jenym .
SFX 0221 i jenymaj .
SFX 0221 i jenymi .
SFX 0221 i ješe .
SFX 0221 i ještaj .
SFX 0221 i ještej .
SFX 0221 i ješće .
SFX 0221 i jo .
SFX 0221 i ju .

SFX 0222 Y 50
SFX 0222 a aj .
SFX 0222 a e .
SFX 0222 a eho .
SFX 0222 a ej .
SFX 0222 a eje .
SFX 0222 a eju .
SFX 0222 a emu .
SFX 0222 a i .
SFX 0222 a iša .
SFX 0222 a iše .
SFX 0222 a išeho .
SFX 0222 a išej .
SFX 0222 a išeje .
SFX 0222 a išeju .
SFX 0222 a išemu .
SFX 0222 a iši .
SFX 0222 a išich .
SFX 0222 a išim .
SFX 0222 a išimaj .
SFX 0222 a išimi .
SFX 0222 a išo .
SFX 0222 a išoh .
SFX 0222 a išom .
SFX 0222 a išu .
SFX 0222 a je .
SFX 0222 a o .
SFX 0222 a oh .
SFX 0222 a om .
SFX 0222 a u .
SFX 0222 a y .
SFX 0222 a ych .
SFX 0222 a ym .
SFX 0222 a ymaj .
SFX 0222 a ymi .
SFX 0222 a ša .
SFX 0222 a še .
SFX 0222 a šeho .
SFX 0222 a šej .
SFX 0222 a šeje .
SFX 0222 a šeju .
SFX 0222 a šemu .
SFX 0222 a ši .
SFX 0222 a šich .
SFX 0222 a šim .
SFX 0222 a šimaj .
SFX 0222 a šimi .
SFX 0222 a šo .
SFX 0222 a šoh .
SFX 0222 a šom .
SFX 0222 a šu .

SFX 0223 Y 18
SFX 0223 le li ..
SFX 0223 le ła ..
SFX 0223 le łaj ..
SFX 0223 le łe ..
SFX 0223 le łeho ..
SFX 0223 le łej ..
SFX 0223 le łeje ..
SFX 0223 le łeju ..
SFX 0223 le łemu ..
SFX 0223 le ło ..
SFX 0223 le łoh ..
SFX 0223 le łom ..
SFX 0223 le łu ..
SFX 0223 le ły ..
SFX 0223 le łych ..
SFX 0223 le łym ..
SFX 0223 le łymaj ..
SFX 0223 le łymi ..

SFX 0224 Y 54
SFX 0224 0 ch .
SFX 0224 0 chmoj .
SFX 0224 0 chmy .
SFX 0224 0 chu .
SFX 0224 0 dźa .
SFX 0224 0 j .
SFX 0224 0 jmoj .
SFX 0224 0 jmy .
SFX 0224 0 jo .
SFX 0224 0 jtaj .
SFX 0224 0 jtej .
SFX 0224 0 jće .
SFX 0224 0 li .
SFX 0224 0 m .
SFX 0224 0 moj .
SFX 0224 0 my .
SFX 0224 0 ta .
SFX 0224 0 taj .
SFX 0224 0 te .
SFX 0224 0 teho .
SFX 0224 0 tej .
SFX 0224 0 teje .
SFX 0224 0 teju .
SFX 0224 0 temu .
SFX 0224 0 toh .
SFX 0224 0 tom .
SFX 0224 0 tu .
SFX 0224 0 ty .
SFX 0224 0 tych .
SFX 0224 0 tym .
SFX 0224 0 tymaj .
SFX 0224 0 tymi .
SFX 0224 0 wši .
SFX 0224 0 ć .
SFX 0224 0 ća .
SFX 0224 0 ćach .
SFX 0224 0 ćam .
SFX 0224 0 će .
SFX 0224 0 ćemi .
SFX 0224 0 ći .
SFX 0224 0 ćom .
SFX 0224 0 ćomaj .
SFX 0224 0 ćow .
SFX 0224 0 ću .
SFX 0224 0 ł .
SFX 0224 0 ła .
SFX 0224 0 łe .
SFX 0224 0 ło .
SFX 0224 0 łoj .
SFX 0224 0 š .
SFX 0224 0 še .
SFX 0224 0 štaj .
SFX 0224 0 štej .
SFX 0224 0 šće .

SFX 0225 Y 8
SFX 0225 0 ach .
SFX 0225 0 am .
SFX 0225 0 ami .
SFX 0225 0 je .
SFX 0225 0 omaj .
SFX 0225 0 ow .
SFX 0225 0 u .
SFX 0225 0 y .

SFX 0226 Y 11
SFX 0226 a ach .
SFX 0226 a am .
SFX 0226 a e .
SFX 0226 a ej .
SFX 0226 a emi .
SFX 0226 a o .
SFX 0226 a om .
SFX 0226 a omaj .
SFX 0226 a ow .
SFX 0226 a u .
SFX 0226 a us .

SFX 0227 Y 15
SFX 0227 e ša .
SFX 0227 e še .
SFX 0227 e šeho .
SFX 0227 e šej .
SFX 0227 e šeje .
SFX 0227 e šeju .
SFX 0227 e šemu .
SFX 0227 e ši .
SFX 0227 e šich .
SFX 0227 e šim .
SFX 0227 e šimaj .
SFX 0227 e šimi .
SFX 0227 e šoh .
SFX 0227 e šom .
SFX 0227 e šu .

SFX 0228 Y 33
SFX 0228 e ocy .
SFX 0228 e oka .
SFX 0228 e okaj .
SFX 0228 e oke .
SFX 0228 e okeho .
SFX 0228 e okej .
SFX 0228 e okeje .
SFX 0228 e okeju .
SFX 0228 e okemu .
SFX 0228 e oki .
SFX 0228 e okich .
SFX 0228 e okim .
SFX 0228 e okimaj .
SFX 0228 e okimi .
SFX 0228 e oko .
SFX 0228 e okoh .
SFX 0228 e okom .
SFX 0228 e oku .
SFX 0228 e ša .
SFX 0228 e še .
SFX 0228 e šeho .
SFX 0228 e šej .
SFX 0228 e šeje .
SFX 0228 e šeju .
SFX 0228 e šemu .
SFX 0228 e ši .
SFX 0228 e šich .
SFX 0228 e šim .
SFX 0228 e šimaj .
SFX 0228 e šimi .
SFX 0228 e šoh .
SFX 0228 e šom .
SFX 0228 e šu .

SFX 0229 Y 13
SFX 0229 t ta .
SFX 0229 t tach .
SFX 0229 t taj .
SFX 0229 t tam .
SFX 0229 t tami .
SFX 0229 t tej .
SFX 0229 t to .
SFX 0229 t tom .
SFX 0229 t tomaj .
SFX 0229 t tow .
SFX 0229 t ća .
SFX 0229 t će .
SFX 0229 t ći .

SFX 0230 Y 55
SFX 0230 0 i .
SFX 0230 0 ich .
SFX 0230 0 ichmoj .
SFX 0230 0 ichmy .
SFX 0230 0 ichu .
SFX 0230 0 ili .
SFX 0230 0 imoj .
SFX 0230 0 imy .
SFX 0230 0 itaj .
SFX 0230 0 itej .
SFX 0230 0 iwši .
SFX 0230 0 ić .
SFX 0230 0 iće .
SFX 0230 0 ił .
SFX 0230 0 iła .
SFX 0230 0 iłe .
SFX 0230 0 iło .
SFX 0230 0 iłoj .
SFX 0230 0 iš .
SFX 0230 0 ištaj .
SFX 0230 0 ištej .
SFX 0230 0 išće .
SFX 0230 0 ja .
SFX 0230 0 jena .
SFX 0230 0 jenaj .
SFX 0230 0 jene .
SFX 0230 0 jeneho .
SFX 0230 0 jenej .
SFX 0230 0 jeneje .
SFX 0230 0 jeneju .
SFX 0230 0 jenemu .
SFX 0230 0 jeni .
SFX 0230 0 jenja .
SFX 0230 0 jenjach .
SFX 0230 0 jenjam .
SFX 0230 0 jenje .
SFX 0230 0 jenjemi .
SFX 0230 0 jenjom .
SFX 0230 0 jenjomaj .
SFX 0230 0 jenjow .
SFX 0230 0 jenju .
SFX 0230 0 jenoh .
SFX 0230 0 jenom .
SFX 0230 0 jenu .
SFX 0230 0 jeny .
SFX 0230 0 jenych .
SFX 0230 0 jenym .
SFX 0230 0 jenymaj .
SFX 0230 0 jenymi .
SFX 0230 0 ju .
SFX 0230 0 moj .
SFX 0230 0 my .
SFX 0230 0 taj .
SFX 0230 0 tej .
SFX 0230 0 će .

SFX 0231 Y 33
SFX 0231 a aj .
SFX 0231 a e .
SFX 0231 a eho .
SFX 0231 a ej .
SFX 0231 a eje .
SFX 0231 a eju .
SFX 0231 a emu .
SFX 0231 a i .
SFX 0231 a iša .
SFX 0231 a iše .
SFX 0231 a išeho .
SFX 0231 a išej .
SFX 0231 a išeje .
SFX 0231 a išeju .
SFX 0231 a išemu .
SFX 0231 a iši .
SFX 0231 a išich .
SFX 0231 a išim .
SFX 0231 a išimaj .
SFX 0231 a išimi .
SFX 0231 a išo .
SFX 0231 a išoh .
SFX 0231 a išom .
SFX 0231 a išu .
SFX 0231 a o .
SFX 0231 a oh .
SFX 0231 a om .
SFX 0231 a u .
SFX 0231 a y .
SFX 0231 a ych .
SFX 0231 a ym .
SFX 0231 a ymaj .
SFX 0231 a ymi .

SFX 0232 Y 11
SFX 0232 i ich .
SFX 0232 i im .
SFX 0232 i imaj .
SFX 0232 i imi .
SFX 0232 i je .
SFX 0232 i jeho .
SFX 0232 i jej .
SFX 0232 i jeju .
SFX 0232 i jemu .
SFX 0232 i joh .
SFX 0232 i jom .

SFX 0233 Y 9
SFX 0233 im ich ..
SFX 0233 im imaj ..
SFX 0233 im imi ..
SFX 0233 im ja ..
SFX 0233 im je ..
SFX 0233 im jej ..
SFX 0233 im jeje ..
SFX 0233 im jeju ..
SFX 0233 im ju ..

SFX 0234 Y 12
SFX 0234 0 a .
SFX 0234 0 ach .
SFX 0234 0 aj .
SFX 0234 0 am .
SFX 0234 0 ami .
SFX 0234 0 ej .
SFX 0234 0 ja .
SFX 0234 0 je .
SFX 0234 0 o .
SFX 0234 0 om .
SFX 0234 0 omaj .
SFX 0234 0 ow .

SFX 0235 Y 7
SFX 0235 0 sach .
SFX 0235 0 saj .
SFX 0235 0 sam .
SFX 0235 0 sami .
SFX 0235 0 somaj .
SFX 0235 0 sow .
SFX 0235 0 sy .

SFX 0236 Y 12
SFX 0236 0 a .
SFX 0236 0 ach .
SFX 0236 0 aj .
SFX 0236 0 am .
SFX 0236 0 ami .
SFX 0236 0 ej .
SFX 0236 0 o .
SFX 0236 0 om .
SFX 0236 0 omaj .
SFX 0236 0 ow .
SFX 0236 0 źa .
SFX 0236 0 źe .

SFX 0237 Y 13
SFX 0237 ł le .
SFX 0237 ł ljo .
SFX 0237 ł ła .
SFX 0237 ł łach .
SFX 0237 ł łaj .
SFX 0237 ł łam .
SFX 0237 ł łami .
SFX 0237 ł łej .
SFX 0237 ł ło .
SFX 0237 ł łom .
SFX 0237 ł łomaj .
SFX 0237 ł łow .
SFX 0237 ł ły .
